Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.472

Warren G. Magnuson institute—Local endowment fund.

The state matching funds and the private donations shall be deposited in the university's local endowment fund. The university is responsible for investing and maintaining all moneys within the fund. The principal of the invested endowment fund shall not be invaded. The university may augment the endowment fund with additional private donations. The earnings of the fund shall be used solely to support the purposes of the Warren G. Magnuson institute for biomedical research and health professions training as set forth in RCW 28B.20.464.

[ 1990 c 282 s 6.]